Connecticut, session 2026, SB00276.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Municipality" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148
of the general statutes;
(2) "Portable document format" has the same meaning as provided in
section 52-50a of the general statutes; and
(3) "Comma-separated value format" means an electronic file format
that separates data fields containing numeric or textual values using one
or more specific characters such that the document may be easily
searched by electronic means.
(b) Not later than January 15, 2027, and on or before the fifteenth day
of each month thereafter, each municipality shall post a report
concerning the revenue and expenditures of the municipality in the
preceding month on the municipality's Internet web site. Such report
LCO No. 1355 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 276
shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) The budget allocation for
each municipal department or office in the preceding month, (2) the
expenditures of each municipal department or office in the preceding
month, (3) any revenue that was projected to be received by the
municipality in the preceding month that is attributable to any line item
in the budget adopted by the municipality for the current fiscal year,
and (4) any revenue received by the municipality in the preceding
month that is attributable to any such line item.
(c) Any report posted by a municipality pursuant to this section shall
be (1) in both a portable document format and a comma-separated value
format, and (2) maintained on the Internet web site of the municipality
for not less than three years from the date of such posting.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section